Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
PART 4
TEMPORARY CUSTODY AND SHELTER

19-3-401. Taking children into custody.

A child may be taken into temporary custody by a law enforcement officer without order of the court:

When the child is abandoned, lost, or seriously endangered in such child's surroundings or seriously endangers others and immediate removal appears to be necessary for such child's protection or the protection of others;

When there are reasonable grounds to believe that such child has run away or escaped from such child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian and the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian has not made a report to a law enforcement agency that the
child has run away from home; or

When an arrest warrant has been issued for such child's parent or guardian on the basis of an alleged violation of section 18-3-304, C.R.S. No child taken into temporary custody pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall be placed in detention or jail.

(1.3) A child shall be taken into temporary custody by a law enforcement officer without order of the court when there are reasonable grounds to believe the child has run away from the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian and the child's parents,
guardian, or legal custodian has made a report to a law enforcement agency that the child has run away from home.

(1.5) An emergency exists and a child is seriously endangered as described in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section whenever the safety or well-being of a child is immediately at issue and there is no other reasonable way to protect the child
without removing the child from the child's home. If such an emergency exists, a child shall be removed from such child's home and placed in protective custody regardless of whether reasonable efforts to preserve the family
have been made.

The taking of a child into temporary custody under this section shall not be deemed an arrest, nor shall it constitute a police record.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (1.5) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subsections (3)(b) and (3)(c) of this section, a newborn child, as defined in section 19-1-103, who is not in a hospital setting must not be taken into temporary
protective custody for a period of longer than twenty-four hours without an order of the court made pursuant to section 19-3-405 (1). The order must include findings that an emergency situation exists and that the newborn
child is seriously endangered as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

A newborn child, as defined in section 19-1-103, who is in a hospital setting must not be taken into temporary protective custody without an order of the court made pursuant to section 19-3-405 (1). The order must include findings that an emergency situation
exists and that the newborn child is seriously endangered as described in subsection (1)(a) of this section. A newborn child may be detained in a hospital by a law enforcement officer upon the recommendation of a county
department or by a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or physician assistant while an order of the court pursuant to section 19-3-405 (1) is being pursued, but the newborn child must be released if a
court order pursuant to section 19-3-405 (1) is denied.

The court orders required by subsections (3)(a) and (3)(b) of this section are not required in the following circumstances:

When a newborn child is identified by a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or physician assistant engaged in the admission, care, or treatment of patients as being affected by substance abuse or demonstrating withdrawal symptoms resulting
from prenatal drug exposure;

When the newborn child's only identifiable birth parent has been determined by a physician, registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional to meet the criteria specified in section 27-65-106 for custody, treatment, and evaluation of a mental
health disorder or grave disability;

When both of the newborn child's birth parents have been determined by a physician, registered nurse, or qualified mental health professional to meet the criteria specified in section 27-65-106 for custody, treatment, and evaluation of a mental health
disorder or grave disability; or

When the newborn child is subject to an environment exposing the newborn child to a laboratory for manufacturing controlled substances as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S.

At the time a law enforcement officer takes a newborn child into temporary protective custody, the law enforcement officer shall provide the notices required by sections 19-3-402 and 19-3-212 directly to the newborn child's identifiable birth parent or
parents in both verbal and written form. Such notices may be provided to the child's identifiable birth parent or parents in a language that the birth parent or parents understand, and the law enforcement officer may designate
another person to assist him or her in providing such written and verbal notices to fulfill this requirement, if necessary.

If a newborn child is taken into temporary protective custody pursuant to this subsection (3), the county department may contact the child's identifiable birth parent or parents to obtain the names of any relatives or other persons in the parent's or
parents' community who may be appropriate, capable, and willing to care for the newborn child prior to the hearing required by section 19-3-403. In addition, if the identifiable parent or parents are not citizens of the
United States, the county department may request the parent's or parents' consent to notify the parent's or parents' government of origin of the situation and, if consent is given, may contact the parent's or parents' government
of origin.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 775, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 93:
Entire section amended, p. 1016, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2004:
(3) added, p. 429, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:
(1)(b) amended and (1.3) added, p. 337, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 2010:
(3)(c)(II) and (3)(c)(III) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 791, § 43, effective April 29.

L. 2016:
(3)(b) and (3)(c)(I) amended, (SB 16-158), ch. 204, p. 727, § 16, effective August 10.

L. 2017:
IP(3)(c), (3)(c)(II), and (3)(c)(III) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1314, § 161, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
(3)(b) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 420, § 55, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 731, § 76, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3)(c)(II) and (3)(c)(III) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3232, § 35, effective August 10.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-2-101 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2004 act enacting subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 140, Session Laws of Colorado 2004. For the legislative declaration in SB 16-158, see section 1 of chapter 204,
Session Laws of Colorado 2016. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado
2018.

19-3-402. Duty of officer - notification - release or detention.

When a child is taken into temporary custody, the officer shall notify a parent, guardian, or legal custodian without unnecessary delay and inform him that, if the child is placed out of the child's home, all parties have a right to a prompt hearing to
determine whether the child is to remain out of the child's home for a further period of time. Such notification may be made to a person with whom the child is residing if a parent, guardian, or legal custodian cannot be located.
If the officer taking the child into custody is unable to make such notification, it may be made by any other law enforcement officer, probation officer, detention center counselor, shelter care provider, or common jailor in whose
physical custody the child is placed.

The child shall then be released to the care of his or her parents or other responsible adult, unless it is in the child's best interests and necessary for the child's welfare to be placed out of the child's home. In the event the child is placed out
of the child's home, if in the best interests of the child, preference may be given to placing the child with the child's grandparent who is appropriate, capable, willing, and available to care for the child. The court
may make reasonable orders as conditions of said release and may provide that any violation of such orders shall subject the child or the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian to contempt sanctions of the court.
The parent or other person to whom the child is released may be required to sign a written promise, on forms supplied by the court, to bring the child to the court at a time set or to be set by the court.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, when the child is part of a sibling group and the sibling group is being placed out of the home, if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing,
and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, it shall be presumed that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption
may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), a child shall not be detained by law enforcement officials any longer than is reasonably necessary to obtain his name, age, residence, and other necessary information and to contact his parents,
guardian, or legal custodian.

If he is not released as provided in subsection (2) of this section, he shall be taken directly to the court or to the place of detention, or a temporary holding facility, or a shelter designated by the court without unnecessary delay.

The officer or other person who takes a child to a detention or shelter facility or a temporary holding facility shall notify the court and any agency or persons so designated by the court at the earliest opportunity that the child has been taken into
custody and where he has been taken. He shall also promptly file a brief written report with the court and any agency or person so designated by the court stating the facts which led to the child being taken into custody and the
reason why the child was not released.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 776, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1), (3)(b), and (4) amended, p. 928, § 4, effective April 23.

L. 90:
(1) and (2) amended, p. 1034, § 1, effective April 3.

L. 91:
(2) amended, p. 264, § 7, effective May 31.

L. 2003:
(2) amended, p. 2622, § 2, effective June 5.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-2-102 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

19-3-403. Temporary custody - hearing - time limits - restriction - rules.

A child who must be taken from his or her home but who does not require physical restriction may be given temporary care with his or her grandparent, upon the grandparent's request, if in the best interests of the child, in a shelter facility designated
by the court or with the county department of human or social services and must not be placed in detention. If an appropriate shelter facility does not exist, the child may be placed in a staff-secure temporary holding facility
authorized by the court.

When a child is placed in a shelter facility or a temporary holding facility not operated by the department of human services designated by the court, the law enforcement official taking the child into custody shall promptly so notify the court. He shall
also notify a parent or legal guardian or, if a parent or legal guardian cannot be located within the county, the person with whom the child has been residing and inform him of the right to a prompt hearing to determine whether
the child is to be detained further. The court shall hold such hearing within forty-eight hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays. A child requiring physical restraint may be placed in a juvenile detention facility
operated by or under contract with the department of human services for a period of not more than twenty-four hours, including Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

Repealed.

(3.5) When temporary custody is placed with the county department of human or social services pursuant to this section or section 19-3-405 or when an emergency protection order is entered pursuant to section 19-3-405, the court shall hold a hearing within
seventy-two hours after placement, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays, to determine further custody of the child or whether the emergency protection order should continue. Such a hearing need not be held if a
hearing has previously been held pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(3.6) (a) (I) The office of the state court administrator shall prepare a form affidavit and advisement. The form affidavit and advisement shall be available at each judicial district to each parent attending a temporary custody hearing. The form affidavit
and advisement shall:

Advise the parent that he or she is required to provide the requested information fully and completely under penalties of perjury and contempt of court;

Require the parent to list the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of, and any comments concerning the appropriateness of the child's potential placement with, every grandparent, aunt, uncle, brother, sister, half-sibling, and first cousin of the
child;

Provide a section in which the parent may list the names, addresses, telephone numbers of, and any comments concerning the appropriateness of the child's potential placement with, other relatives and kin who have a significant relationship with the child;

Advise the parent that failure to identify these relatives in a timely manner may result in the child being placed permanently outside of the home of the child's relatives, if the child cannot be safely returned to the home of the child's parents;

Advise the parent that the child may risk life-long damage to his or her emotional well-being if the child becomes attached to one caregiver and is later removed from the caregiver's home;

Require the parent to acknowledge that he or she understands the advisements contained in the form; and

Require the parent to sign and date the form.

At the hearing, information may be supplied to the court in the form of written or oral reports, affidavits, testimony, or other relevant information that the court may wish to receive. Any information having probative value may be received by the court,
regardless of its admissibility under the Colorado rules of evidence.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.6)(a)(III) is effective until January 9, 2023.] The court shall advise the parents of the child that the child may be placed with a relative if, in the court's opinion, such placement is appropriate and in
the child's best interests. The court shall order the parents to complete the form affidavit and advisement described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) no later than seven business days after the date of
the hearing or prior to the next hearing on the matter, whichever occurs first. The original completed form shall be filed with the court, and a copy delivered to the county department of human or social services
no later than five business days after the date of the hearing. Each parent, the guardian ad litem, and counsel for each parent, if any, shall also receive copies of the completed form. The court may advise each
parent of the penalties associated with perjury and contempt of court, if necessary. Each parent may suggest an adult relative or relatives whom he or she believes to be the most appropriate caretaker or caretakers
for the child. If appropriate, the child or children shall be consulted regarding suggested relative caretakers. The court shall order each parent to notify every relative who may be an appropriate relative caretaker
for the child that failure to come forward in a timely manner may result in the child being placed permanently outside of the home of the child's relatives, if the child is not able to return to the child's home.
In addition, the court shall advise each parent that failure to identify these relatives in a timely manner may result in the child being placed permanently outside of the home of the child's relatives.

(III)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3.6)(a)(III) is effective January 9, 2023.

]
The court shall advise the child's parents that the child may be placed with a relative if, in the court's opinion, such placement is appropriate and in the child's best interests. The court
shall order the parents to complete the form affidavit and advisement described in subsection (3.6)(a)(I) of this section no later than seven business days after the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing on the matter, whichever occurs first. The original completed form must be filed with the court, and a copy delivered to the county department of human or social services no later than five business
days after the date of the hearing. Each parent, the guardian ad litem or counsel for youth, and counsel for each parent, if any, shall also receive copies of the completed form. The court may advise each parent
of the penalties associated with perjury and contempt of court, if necessary. Each parent may suggest an adult relative or relatives whom the parent believes to be the most appropriate caretaker or caretakers
for the child. If appropriate, the child or children shall be consulted regarding suggested relative caretakers. The court shall order each parent to notify every relative who may be an appropriate relative
caretaker for the child that failure to come forward in a timely manner may result in the child being placed permanently outside of the home of the child's relatives, if the child is not able to return to the
child's home. In addition, the court shall advise each parent that failure to identify these relatives in a timely manner may result in the child being placed permanently outside of the home of the child's relatives.

The court shall order a county department of human or social services to exercise due diligence to contact all grandparents and other adult relatives within thirty days following the removal of the child and to inform them about placement possibilities
for the child, unless the court determines there is good cause not to contact or good cause to delay contacting the child's relatives, including but not limited to family or domestic violence. A county department
of human or social services shall provide notice to the relatives that the child has been removed from his or her home; options under federal, state, and local law to participate in the child's care or placement;
options that may be lost by failing to respond; and requirements to become a foster parent, and services and supports available to the child placed in a foster home. The county department of human or social services
shall advise each appropriate identified relative that the possibility for placement of the child in his or her home may terminate at a future date; request each such relative who is interested in becoming a placement
option for the child to come forward at the earliest possible time to seek placement of the child in his or her home and to cooperate with the county department of human or social services to expedite procedures
pertaining to the placement of the child in his or her home, if the child cannot be safely returned to the home of the child's parents. The department of human services shall promulgate rules for the implementation
of this subparagraph (IV) and subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a).

The court may consider and give preference to giving temporary custody to a child's relative who is appropriate, capable, willing, and available for care if it is in the best interests of the child and if the court finds that there is no suitable birth
or adoptive parent available, with due diligence having been exercised in attempting to locate any such birth or adoptive parent. The court may place or continue custody with the county department of human or social
services if the court is satisfied from the information presented at the hearing that such custody is appropriate and in the child's best interests, or the court may enter such other orders as are appropriate. The
court may authorize the county department of human or social services with custody of a child to place the child with a relative without the necessity for a hearing if a county department locates an appropriate,
capable, and willing relative who is available to care for the child and the guardian ad litem of the child concurs that the placement is in the best interests of the child. If the county department of human or
social services places a child with a relative without a hearing pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (3.6)(a)(V), the county department shall fully inform the court of the details concerning the child's
placement on the record at the next hearing. If the court enters an order removing a child from the home or continuing a child in a placement out of the home, the court shall make the findings required pursuant
to section 19-1-115 (6), if such findings are warranted by the evidence.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3.6) to the contrary, when the child is part of a sibling group and the sibling group is being placed out of the home, if the county department locates an appropriate, capable, willing,
and available joint placement for all of the children in the sibling group, the court shall presume that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is in the best interests of the children. Such presumption
may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence that placement of the entire sibling group in the joint placement is not in the best interests of a child or of the children.

(3.7) A child who is alleged to be a runaway from a state other than Colorado may be held in a shelter care or other appropriate facility for up to seven days, during which time arrangements shall be made for returning the child to the state of his residence.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] If it appears that any child being held in a shelter facility may have an intellectual and developmental disability, as provided in article 10.5 of title 27, the court
shall refer the child to the nearest case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, for an eligibility determination. If it appears that any child being held in a shelter facility pursuant to this article 3
may have a mental health disorder, as provided in section 27-65-106, the intake personnel or other appropriate personnel shall contact a mental health professional to do a mental health disorder prescreening on the child.
The court must be notified of the contact and may take appropriate action. If a mental health disorder prescreening is requested, it must be conducted in an appropriate place accessible to the child and the mental health
professional. A request for a mental health disorder prescreening must not extend the time within which a hearing is to be held pursuant to this section. If a hearing has been set but has not yet occurred, the mental health
disorder prescreening must be conducted prior to the hearing; except that the prescreening must not extend the time within which a hearing is to be held pursuant to this section.

(4)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] If it appears that any child being held in a shelter facility may have an intellectual and developmental disability, as provided in article 10.5 of title 27, the court shall
refer the child to the nearest case management agency, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, for an eligibility determination. If it appears that any child being held in a shelter facility pursuant to this article 3 may
have a mental health disorder, as provided in section 27-65-106, the intake personnel or other appropriate personnel shall contact a mental health professional to do a mental health disorder prescreening on the child.
The court must be notified of the contact and may take appropriate action. If a mental health disorder prescreening is requested, it must be conducted in an appropriate place accessible to the child and the mental health
professional. A request for a mental health disorder prescreening must not extend the time within which a hearing is to be held pursuant to this section. If a hearing has been set but has not yet occurred, the mental
health disorder prescreening must be conducted prior to the hearing; except that the prescreening must not extend the time within which a hearing is to be held pursuant to this section.

If a child has been ordered detained pending an adjudication, disposition, or other court hearing and the child subsequently appears to have a mental health disorder, as provided in section 27-65-106, the intake personnel or other appropriate personnel
shall contact the court with a recommendation for a mental health disorder prescreening. A mental health disorder prescreening must be conducted at any appropriate place accessible to the child and the mental health professional
within twenty-four hours after the request, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays.

If the mental health professional finds, as a result of the prescreening, that the child may have a mental health disorder, the mental health professional shall recommend to the court that the child be evaluated pursuant to section 27-65-106, and the
court shall proceed as provided in section 19-3-506.

Nothing in this subsection (4) precludes the use of procedures for an emergency mental health hold pursuant to section 27-65-106.

The court may, at any time, order the release of any child being held pursuant to section 19-3-401 from shelter care or a temporary holding facility not operated by the department of human services without holding a hearing, either without restriction
or upon written promise of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian to bring the child to the court at a time set or to be set by the court.

After making a reasonable effort to obtain the consent of the parent, guardian, or other legal custodian, the court may authorize or consent to medical, surgical, or dental treatment or care for a child placed in shelter care or a temporary holding facility
not operated by the department of human services.

When the court finds that emergency medical, surgical, or dental treatment is required for a child placed in shelter care or a temporary holding facility not operated by the department of human services, it may authorize such treatment or care if the
parents, guardian, or legal custodian are not immediately available.

The court may also issue temporary orders for legal custody as provided in section 19-1-115. The court shall enter visitation orders consistent with section 19-3-217.

Any law enforcement officer, employee of the division in the department of human services responsible for youth services, or other person acting under the direction of the court who in good faith transports any child, releases any child from custody pursuant
to a written policy of a court, releases any child from custody pursuant to any written criteria established pursuant to this title, or detains any child pursuant to court order or written policy or criteria established pursuant
to this title shall be immune from civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result by reason of such act. For purposes of any proceedings, civil or criminal, the good faith of any such person shall be presumed.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 776, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 89:
(1), (2), (3)(a), (5), and (6) amended, p. 928, § 5, effective April 23.

L. 90:
(2), (4)(a), (5), and (6) amended, (3) repealed, and (3.5) to (3.7) added, pp. 1035, 1037, §§ 2, 6, effective April 3; (8) added, p. 1019, § 6, effective April 20; (3.5) amended, p. 1033, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 91:
(1) and (3.6) amended, p. 264, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 93:
(3.6) amended, p. 2016, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 94:
(2), (5), (6), and (8) amended, p. 2683, § 201, effective July 1.

L. 97:
(3.5) amended, p. 518, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2000:
(3.6) amended, p. 1123, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2001:
(3.6) amended, p. 846, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2003:
(3.6) amended, p. 2623, § 3, effective June 5.

L. 2005:
(3.6) amended, p. 676, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2006:
(4) amended, p. 1401, § 57, effective August 7.

L. 2009:
(3.6)(a)(III) and (3.6)(a)(IV) amended, (SB 09-245), ch. 436, p. 2423, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2010:
(4) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 791, § 44, effective April 29.

L. 2017:
(4) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1314, § 162, effective May 25.

L. 2018:
(1), (3.5), and (3.6)(a)(V) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 420, § 56, effective August 8.

L. 2021:
(7) amended, (HB 21-1101), ch. 481, p. 3427, § 2, effective September 1; (4)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 327, § 10, effective July 1, 2024.

L. 2022:
(4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (4)(d) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, pp. 3232, 3233, §§ 36, 37, effective August 10; (3.6)(a)(III) amended, (HB 22-1038), ch. 92, p. 442, § 26, effective January 9, 2023.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-2-103 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act amending subsection (3.6), see section 1 of chapter 241, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending subsection
(3.6), see section 1 of chapter 194, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017. For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section
1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1038, see section 1 of chapter 92, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

19-3-403.5. Temporary shelter.

Temporary shelter is the temporary care of a child in a physically unrestricted setting pending a return to the child's home or placement in an appropriate alternate setting pursuant to applicable state law. Receiving temporary care in temporary shelter
is voluntary and a child may leave at any time. A child may not be placed in a licensed temporary shelter facility for more than five days.

A person or entity providing temporary shelter must allow for professionals to complete assessments to determine the child's treatment needs and establish plans to safely transition the child back to the care of the child's parent, guardian, legal custodian,
or kin, or to another community-based facility or home, as informed by the relative information form described in section 19-2.5-1404 (1)(b)(VIII). A child in temporary shelter must have access to ongoing educational services.

The general assembly strongly encourages a judicial district's juvenile services planning committee, or the judicial district if the judicial district has not established a juvenile services planning committee, to consider less restrictive settings, including
kinship placement, foster care, respite care, and group homes that are small, home-like, and based in the community of the sheltered child, before relying on licensed temporary shelter facilities.

Source:

L. 2022:
Entire section added, (HB 22-1056), ch. 383, p. 2740, § 3, effective June 7.

19-3-404. Temporary shelter - child's home.

The court may find that it is not necessary to remove a child from his or her home to a temporary shelter facility and may provide temporary shelter in the child's home by authorizing a representative of the county or district department of human or social
services, which has emergency caretaker services available, to remain in the child's home with the child until a parent, legal guardian, or relative of the child enters the home and expresses willingness and has the apparent ability,
as determined by the state department, to resume charge of the child. In no event must such period of time exceed seventy-two hours. In the case of a relative, the relative is to assume charge of the child until a parent or legal guardian
enters the home and expresses willingness and has the apparent ability, as determined by the state department, to resume charge of the child. The director of the county or district department of human or social services shall designate
in writing the representatives of the county or district departments of human or social services authorized to perform such duties.

Source:

L. 87:
Entire title R&RE, p. 778, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2018:
Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 421, § 57, effective August 8.

Editor's note:
This section was contained in a title that was repealed and reenacted in 1987. Provisions of this section, as it existed in 1987, are similar to those contained in 19-2-103.5 as said section existed in 1986, the year prior
to the repeal and reenactment of this title.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

19-3-405. Temporary protective custody.

In addition to other powers granted to the court for the protection of children, the court may issue verbal or written temporary protective custody orders or emergency protection orders, or both. Each judicial district shall be responsible for making
available a person appointed by the judge of the juvenile court, who may be the judge, a magistrate, or any other officer of the court, to be available by telephone at all times to act with the authorization and authority of the
court to issue such orders.

Temporary protective custody orders may be requested by the county department of human or social services, a law enforcement officer, an administrator of a hospital in which a child reasonably believed to have been neglected or abused is being treated,
or any physician who has before him or her a child he or she reasonably believes has been abused or neglected, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, if such person or department believes that the circumstances
or conditions of the child are such that continuing the child's place of residence or in the care and custody of the person responsible for the child's care and custody would present a danger to that child's life or health
in the reasonably foreseeable future.

Emergency protection orders may be requested by the county department of human or social services, a law enforcement officer, an administrator of a hospital in which a child reasonably believed to have been neglected or abused is being treated, or any
physician who has before him or her a child the physician reasonably believes has been abused or neglected, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, if such person or department believes that the child is
able to remain safely in the child's place of residence or in the care and custody of the person responsible for the child's care and custody only if certain emergency protection orders are entered. An emergency protection
order may include but is not limited to:

Restraining a person from threatening, molesting, or injuring the child;

Restraining a person from interfering with the supervision of the child; or

Restraining a person from having contact with the child or the child's residence.

The county department of human or social services must be notified of such action immediately by the court-appointed official in order that child protection proceedings may be initiated.

In any case, such temporary protective custody or emergency protection shall not exceed seventy-two hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and court holidays.

Source:

L. 90:
Entire section added, p. 1036, § 3, effective April 3.

L. 91:
(1) amended, p. 363, § 34, effective April 9.

L. 97:
Entire section amended, p. 519, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:
(2)(a), IP(2)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 421, § 58, effective August 8.

Cross references:
For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.